test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-J-Ж_В-статья_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - статья M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      статья+N+Fem+Sg+Nom: статья́
      статья+N+Fem+Sg+Acc: статью́
      статья+N+Fem+Sg+Gen: статьи́
      статья+N+Fem+Sg+Loc: статье́
      статья+N+Fem+Sg+Dat: статье́
      статья+N+Fem+Sg+Ins: статьёй
      статья+N+Fem+Pl+Nom: статьи́
      статья+N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Inan: статьи́
      статья+N+Fem+Pl+Gen: стате́й
      статья+N+Fem+Pl+Loc: статья́х
      статья+N+Fem+Pl+Dat: статья́м
      статья+N+Fem+Pl+Ins: статья́ми
